Wyoming, session 2025, HB0028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xli)(D), (G) through (J)
and by creating new subparagraphs (K) and (M), 31-7-114(g),
31-7-120(b) and 31-7-305(a)(viii), by creating a new
paragraph (ix), by renumbering (ix) as (x) and (q) are
amended to read:
31-7-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xli) "Serious traffic violation" means any one
(1) of the following:
(D) Improper or erratic lane changes;
(G) Driving a commercial vehicle without
obtaining a commercial driver's license or a commercial
learner's permit;
(H) Driving a commercial motor vehicle
without a commercial driver's license or a commercial
learner's permit in the driver's possession. An individual
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
A person shall not be guilty of a violation of this
subparagraph if the individual person provides proof prior
to or at a court or administrative hearing establishing
that the individual person held a valid commercial driver's
license or a commercial learner's permit on the date of the
citation; or
(J) Driving a commercial motor vehicle
without the proper class of commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers
or type of cargo being transported;.
(K) A violation of state or local law
relating to motor vehicle traffic control that prohibits
using an electronic wireless communication device to write,
send or read text-based communication while driving a
commercial motor vehicle;
(M) A violation of state or local law
relating to motor vehicle traffic control that restricts or
prohibits the in‑hand use of a hand held electronic wireless
communication device while driving a commercial motor
vehicle.
31-7-114. Examinations; visual acuity.
(g) The department may waive the knowledge test,
skills test or both, specified in subsection (e) of this
section for a commercial driver license applicant who meets
the requirements contained in rules and regulations of the
department which shall at a minimum include the
requirements designated in rules and regulations of the
United States department of transportation.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
31-7-120. Records to be kept by division; exceptions.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section,
the division shall, twelve (12) months after conviction,
expunge the record relating to the suspension of a driver's
license of a minor pursuant to W.S. 31-7-128(f) for the
violation of any law or ordinance relating to the
possession or consumption of a controlled substance or
alcohol, except a violation of W.S. 31-5-233. For any
person whose records of a driver's license suspension were
expunged under this subsection, the suspension under this
subsection is deemed not to have occurred and the
individual person may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in
the matter. Notwithstanding W.S. 31-5-1214, records of
suspensions under W.S. 31-7-128(f) shall not be made
available for public inspection except for inspection by
any law enforcement officer or agency. Any driver's license
suspension or related records under this subsection shall
not be the basis for any increase in insurance premiums or
the cancellation of any insurance policy for a minor or his
parents affected by this section. The expunged records
relating to the suspension of a driver's license of a minor
may be considered for purposes of disqualification from
driving a commercial motor vehicle under W.S. 31-7-305.
31-7-305. Disqualification and cancellation; right to
a hearing.
(a) Any person is disqualified from driving a
commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one
(1) year if convicted of a first violation arising from
separate incidents of:
(viii) Driving or being in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
of the person's blood, breath or other bodily substance is
eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more; or
(ix) Driving or being in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the
person's blood, breath or other bodily substance is two
one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more if the person
is under twenty-one (21) years of age and the person holds
a valid commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit at the time of the offense; or
(ix)(x) Violating any local ordinance or state
law in another jurisdiction which is substantially similar
to any of the violations listed in this subsection.
(q) Upon the department receiving credible
information that the holder of a commercial driver's
license or commercial learner's permit is suspected of
obtaining the license in a fraudulent manner, the state
shall notify the license holder in writing at the address
on file that they have thirty (30) days to contact the
department and schedule retesting. The notification shall
specify what tests must be retaken. If the license holder
does not contact the department, does not take the test
required or fails any rescheduled test, the license holder
shall have his license cancelled. Once cancelled, the
license holder shall be required to reapply to the
department to obtain and shall be disqualified from driving
a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year.
Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate rules as necessary to implement this act.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 42, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5